Nevada, session 83, SB4.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 127.053 is hereby amended to read as follows:
127.053 No consent to a specific adoption executed in this
State, or executed outside this State for use in this State, is valid
unless it:
1. Identifies the child to be adopted by name, if any, sex and
date of birth.
2. Is in writing and signed by the person consenting to the
adoption as required in this chapter.
3. Is acknowledged by the person consenting and signing the
consent to adoption in the manner and form required for
conveyances of real property.
4. Contains, at the time of execution, the name of the person or
persons to whom consent to adopt the child is given.
5. Indicates whether the person giving the consent has reason
to know that the child is an Indian child and, if the person does not
have reason to know that the child is an Indian child, includes a
statement that the person will inform the court immediately if,
before the entry of the order or decree of adoption pursuant to NRS
127.150, the person receives information that provides reason to
know that the child is an Indian child.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
6. Is attested by at least two competent, disinterested witnesses
who subscribe their names to the consent in the presence of the
person consenting. If neither the petitioner nor the spouse of a
petitioner is related to the child within the third degree of
consanguinity, then one of the witnesses must be a social worker or
a caseworker employed by:
(a) An agency which provides child welfare services;
(b) An agency licensed in this state to place children for
adoption;
(c) A comparable state or county agency of another state; or
(d) An agency authorized under the laws of another state to
place children for adoption, if the natural parent resides in that state.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)